Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5165.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 21105. (1) The department shall collect and evaluate the information obtained through the registration of underground storage tanks required by section 21102. Not later than September 30, 1987, the department shall provide to the legislature a report containing that contains a compilation of the underground storage tank registration data and an assessment of the actual and potential environmental hazard posed by the tanks. (2) Beginning October 1, 2026, the department shall electronically receive, compile, and store, by means of electronic compliance management software, the following documents and information: (a) Registrations, forms, and other information required to be submitted to the department under section 21102. (b) Notices, inspection and test reports, and other documentary information required to be submitted to the department under this part and the rules promulgated under this part. (3) The compliance management software used under subsection (2) must have capabilities and specifications that include, but are not limited to, all of the following: (a) Are web-based and accessible from web-enabled electronic devices, including mobile devices. (b) Display the required form or task being addressed. (c) Display fields for user and facility identification information, including the use of global positioning or another locator system. (d) Display inspection checklist items that link to corresponding compliance codes or regulations. (e) Have a user response interface for inputting and processing data, including inspection test results. (f) Flag deficiencies for required follow-up. (g) Have an embedded digital camera. (h) Are searchable and facilitate retrieval of all documents and information stored 24 hours a day.